Hawaii, session 2025, SB476.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the use of aerial fireworks during celebrations continues to cause significant disruption and concern.  The legislature believes that a stronger deterrent is needed to curtail the use of illegal fireworks.  According to the 2011 Report of the Illegal Fireworks Task Force to the Legislature for the Regular Session of 2011, an increase in fines associated with illegal fireworks may act as a stronger deterrent. The purpose of this Act is to increase the fines that may be assessed against certain fireworks-related violations. SECTION 2.  Section 132D-14, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows: "(b)  Except as provided in subsection (a) or as otherwise specifically provided for in this chapter, any person violating any other provision of this chapter, shall be fined [no] not more than [$5,000] $           for each violation.  Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary in this section, any person violating section 132D-14.5 shall be fined [at least $500] not less than $           and [no] not more than [$5,000.] $          ." SECTION 3. This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 4. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________